Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
PART 5
PETITION, ADJUDICATION, DISPOSITION

19-3-500.2. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

It is beneficial for a child who is removed from his or her home and placed in foster care to be able to continue relationships with his or her brothers and sisters, regardless of age, in order that the siblings may share their strengths and association
in their everyday and often common experiences. The general assembly also finds that the initial decisions about temporary placement of a child may affect the ultimate permanent placement of the child or of the children
in a sibling group.

When parents and other adult relatives are no longer available to a child, the child's siblings constitute his or her biological family;

When placing children in foster care, efforts should be made to place siblings together, unless there is a danger of specific harm to a child or it is not in the child's or children's best interests to be placed together. The general assembly further
finds that if the county department locates an appropriate, capable, willing, and available joint placement for all of the children in the sibling group, there should be a rebuttable presumption that placement of the entire
sibling group in the joint placement is in the best interests of the children. Such presumption should be rebuttable by a preponderance of the evidence that placement of the entire sibling group in the joint placement is
not in the best interests of a child or of the children.

The general assembly also declares that nothing in this article regarding the placement of sibling groups together should be construed as requiring the removal of a child from his or her home and placement into foster care if that is not in the best interests
of the child.

Source:

L. 2000:
Entire section added, p. 474, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2003:
(1)(c) amended, p. 2624, § 4, effective June 5.

19-3-501. Petition initiation - preliminary investigation - informal adjustment.

Whenever it appears to a law enforcement officer or other person that a child is or appears to be within the court's jurisdiction, as provided in this article 3, the law enforcement officer or other person may refer the matter to the court, which shall
make a preliminary investigation to determine whether the interests of the child or of the community require that further action be taken. The probation department, county department of human or social services, or any other agency
designated by the court shall make the investigation. On the basis of the preliminary investigation, the court may:

Decide that no further action is required, either in the interests of the public or of the child;

Authorize a petition to be filed; or

Make whatever informal adjustment is practicable without a petition if:

The child and his parents, guardian, or other legal custodian were informed of their constitutional and legal rights, including being represented by counsel at every stage of the proceedings;

The facts are admitted and establish prima facie jurisdiction; except that such admission shall not be used in evidence if a petition is filed; and

Written consent is obtained from the parents, guardian, or other legal custodian and also from the child, if of sufficient age and understanding.

Efforts to effect informal adjustment may extend no longer than six months.

Upon receipt of a report filed by a law enforcement agency, or any other person required to report pursuant to section 19-3-304 (2) indicating that a child has suffered abuse as defined in section 19-1-103 (1) and that the best interests of the child
require that he be protected from risk of further such abuse, the court shall then authorize and may order the filing of a petition.

Upon receipt of a report, as described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), from any person other than those specified in said paragraph (a), the court, after such investigation as may be reasonable under the circumstances, may authorize and may order
the filing of a petition.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 778, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 2002:
(2)(a) amended, p. 1035, § 78, effective June 1.

L. 2018:
IP(1) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 422, § 59, effective August 8.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-3-101 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

19-3-502. Petition form and content - limitations on claims in dependency or neglect actions.

The petition and all subsequent court documents in any proceedings brought under this article shall be entitled "The People of the State of Colorado, in the Interest of , a child (or children) and Concerning , Respondent." The petition shall be verified,
and the statements in the petition may be made upon information and belief.

The petition shall set forth plainly the facts which bring the child within the court's jurisdiction. The petition shall also state the name, age, and residence of the child and the names and residences of his parents, guardian, custodian, legal custodian,
stepparent, or spousal equivalent or of his nearest known relative if no parent, guardian, custodian, legal custodian, stepparent, or spousal equivalent is known.

(2.5) The petition in each case where removal of a child from the home is sought shall either state that reasonable efforts to prevent out-of-home placement were made and shall summarize such efforts or, if no services to prevent out-of-home placement
were provided, the petition shall contain an explanation of why such services were not provided or a description of the emergency which precluded the use of services to prevent out-of-home placement of the child. The petition
shall be verified.

(2.7) (a) Pursuant to the provisions of section 19-1-126, the petition must:

Include a statement indicating what continuing inquiries the county department of human or social services has made in determining whether the child who is the subject of the proceeding is an Indian child;

Identify whether the child is an Indian child; and

Include the identity of the Indian child's tribe, if the child is identified as an Indian child.

If notices were sent to the parent or Indian custodian of the child and to the Indian child's tribe, pursuant to section 19-1-126, the postal receipts shall be attached to the petition and filed with the court or filed within ten days after the filing
of the petition, as specified in section 19-1-126 (1)(c).

All petitions filed alleging the dependency or neglect of a child shall include the following statements:

"Termination of the parent-child legal relationship is a possible remedy available if this petition alleging that a child is dependent or neglected is sustained. A separate hearing must be held before such termination is ordered. Termination of the parent-child
legal relationship means that the child who is the subject of this petition would be eligible for adoption."

"If the child is placed out of the home for a period of twelve months or longer, the court shall hold a permanency hearing within said twelve months to determine a permanent placement for the child."

"The review of any decree of placement of a child subsequent to the three-month review required by section 19-1-115 (4)(a) may be conducted as an administrative review by the department of human services, as appropriate. If you are a party to the action,
you have a right to object to an administrative review, and if you object, the review shall be conducted by the court."

No counterclaim, cross claim, or other claim for damages may be asserted by a respondent in an action alleging the dependency or neglect of a child, but nothing in this subsection (4) shall be construed to prohibit a respondent from asserting a claim
for damages in an action independent of an action alleging the dependency or neglect of a child.

(4.5)

[

Editor's note: Subsection (4.5) is effective January 9, 2023.

]
A child named in the petition shall be a party to the proceedings and have the right to attend and fully participate in all hearings related to the child's case. The child's guardian ad litem or counsel for youth
shall provide developmentally appropriate notice to the child of all hearings related to the child's case.

Any parent, guardian, or legal custodian alleged to have abused or neglected a child shall be named as a respondent in the petition concerning such child. The county attorney, city attorney of a city and county, or special county attorney may name any
other parent, guardian, custodian, legal custodian, stepparent, or spousal equivalent as a respondent in the petition if he determines that it is in the best interests of the child to do so.

A person may be named as a special respondent on the grounds that he resides with, has assumed a parenting role toward, has participated in whole or in part in the neglect or abuse of, or maintains a significant relationship with the child. Personal jurisdiction
shall be obtained over a special respondent once he is given notice by a service of summons and a copy of the petition or motion describing the reasons for his joinder. A special respondent shall be afforded an opportunity for
a hearing to contest his joinder and the appropriateness of any orders that affect him and shall have the right to be represented by counsel at such hearing. At any other stage of the proceedings, a special respondent may be represented
by counsel at his own expense.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (7) is effective until January 9, 2023.] In addition to notice to all parties, the court shall ensure that notice is provided of all hearings and reviews held regarding a child to the following persons with whom
a child is placed: Foster parents, pre-adoptive parents, or relatives. Such persons shall have the right to be heard at such hearings and reviews. The persons with whom a child is placed shall provide prior notice to the child
of all hearings and reviews held regarding the child. The foster parent, pre-adoptive parent, or relative providing care to a child shall not be made a party to the action for purposes of any hearings or reviews solely on the basis
of such notice and right to be heard. Notice of hearings and reviews shall not reveal to the respondent parent or other relative the address, last name, or other such identifying information regarding any person providing care
to the child.

(7)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (7) is effective January 9, 2023.

]
In addition to notice to all parties, the court shall ensure that notice is provided of all hearings and reviews held regarding a child to the following persons with whom a child is placed: Foster parents, pre-adoptive
parents, or relatives. Such persons have the right to be heard at such hearings and reviews. The foster parent, pre-adoptive parent, or relative providing care to a child shall not be made a party to the action for purposes
of any hearings or reviews solely on the basis of such notice and right to be heard. Notice of hearings and reviews must not reveal to the respondent parent or other relative the address, last name, or other such identifying
information regarding any person providing care to the child.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 779, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 92:
(3) amended, p. 224, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 93:
(3)(b) amended, p. 389, § 2, effective April 19; (2.5) added, p. 2016, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 94:
(3)(c) amended, p. 2684, § 202, effective July 1.

L. 98:
(7) added, p. 1418, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 99:
(3)(b) amended, p. 911, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2002:
(2.7) added, p. 786, § 6, effective May 30.

L. 2007:
(7) amended, p. 1017, § 7, effective May 22.

L. 2018:
IP(2.7)(a) and (2.7)(a)(I) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 422, § 60, effective August 8.

L. 2022:
(4.5) added and (7) amended, (HB 22-1038), ch. 92, p. 436, § 10, effective January 9, 2023.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-3-102 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration contained in the 1999 act amending subsection (3)(b), see section 1 of chapter 233, Session Laws of Colorado 1999. For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act enacting subsection
(2.7), see section 1 of chapter 217, Session Laws of Colorado 2002. For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018. For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1038, see section
1 of chapter 92, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

19-3-503. Summons - issuance - contents - service.

After a petition has been filed, the court shall promptly issue a summons reciting briefly the substance of the petition. The summons shall also contain a statement, when appropriate, that the termination of the parent-child legal relationship is a possible
remedy under the proceedings and shall set forth the constitutional and legal rights of the child, his parents, guardian, or legal custodian, or any other respondent or special respondent, including the right to have an attorney
present at the hearing on the petition.

No summons shall issue to any respondent who appears voluntarily or who waives service, but any such person shall be provided with a copy of the petition and summons upon appearance or request.

The summons shall require the person or persons having the physical custody of the child to appear, and it may order the child to appear before the court at a time and place stated. If the person or persons so summoned are not the parents or guardian
of the child, then a summons shall also be issued to the parents or guardian, or both, notifying them of the pendency of the case and of the time and place set for hearing.

The court on its own motion or on the motion of any party may join as a respondent or special respondent or require the appearance of any person it deems necessary to the action and authorize the issuance of a summons directed to such person. Any party
to the action may request the issuance of compulsory process by the court requiring the attendance of witnesses on his own behalf or on behalf of the child.

If it appears that the welfare of the child or of the public requires that the child be taken into custody, the court may, by endorsement upon the summons, direct that the person serving the summons take the child into custody at once.

The court may authorize the payment of necessary travel expenses incurred by persons summoned or otherwise required to appear, which payments shall not exceed the amount allowed to witnesses for travel by the district court.

Summonses shall be served personally, pursuant to the Colorado rules of civil procedure. If personal service is used, it shall be sufficient to confer jurisdiction if service is effected not less than two days before the time fixed in the summons for
the appearance of the person served; except that personal service shall be effected not less than five days prior to the time set for a hearing concerning a dependent or neglected child.

If the respondent required to be summoned under subsection (3) of this section cannot be found within the state, the fact of the child's presence in the state shall confer jurisdiction on the court as to any absent respondent if due notice has been given
in the following manner:

When the residence of the person to be served outside the state is known, a copy of the summons and petition shall be sent by certified mail with postage prepaid to such person at his place of residence with a return receipt requested. Service of summons
shall be deemed complete within five days after return of the requested receipt.

When the person to be served has no residence within Colorado and his place of residence is not known or when he cannot be found within the state after due diligence, service may be by publication pursuant to rule 4 (g) of the Colorado rules of civil
procedure; except that service may be by a single publication and must be completed not less than five days prior to the time set for a hearing concerning a dependent or neglected child.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 780, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 2019:
(8)(b) amended, (SB 19-241), ch. 390, p. 3467, § 18, effective August 2.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-3-103 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-3-504. Contempt - warrant.

Any person summoned or required to appear as provided in section 19-3-503 who has acknowledged service and fails to appear without reasonable cause may be proceeded against for contempt of court.

If after reasonable effort the summons cannot be served or if the welfare of the child requires that he be brought immediately into the custody of the court, a bench warrant may be issued for the respondent or for the child.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 781, § 1, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-3-104 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-3-505. Adjudicatory hearing - findings - adjudication.

At the adjudicatory hearing, the court shall consider whether the allegations of the petition are supported by a preponderance of the evidence; except that jurisdictional matters of the age and residence of the child shall be deemed admitted by or on
behalf of the child unless specifically denied prior to the adjudicatory hearing.

Evidence tending to establish the necessity of separating the child from the parents or guardian may be admitted but shall not be required for the making of an order of adjudication.

Adjudicatory hearings shall be held at the earliest possible time, but in no instance shall such hearing be held later than ninety days after service of the petition, or, in a county designated pursuant to section 19-1-123, if the child is under six years
of age at the time a petition is filed in accordance with section 19-3-501 (2), in no instance shall such hearing be held later than sixty days after service of the petition unless the court finds that the best interests of the
child will be served by granting a delay. If the court determines that a delay is necessary, it shall set forth the specific reason why such delay is necessary and shall schedule the adjudicatory hearing at the earliest possible
time following the delay.

When it appears that the evidence presented at the hearing discloses facts not alleged in the petition, the court may proceed immediately to consider the additional or different matters raised by the evidence if the parties consent.

In such event, the court, on the motion of any interested party or on its own motion, shall order the petition to be amended to conform to the evidence.

If the amendment results in a substantial departure from the original allegations in the petition, the court shall continue the hearing on the motion of any interested party, or the court may grant a continuance on its own motion if it finds it to be
in the best interests of the child or any other party to the proceeding.

If it appears from the evidence that the child may have a mental health disorder or an intellectual and developmental disability as these terms are defined in article 10.5 of title 27, subsections (4)(a) to (4)(c) of this section do not apply, and the
court shall proceed pursuant to section 19-3-506.

After making a finding as provided by paragraph (a) of subsection (7) of this section but before making an adjudication, the court may continue the hearing from time to time, allowing the child to remain in his own home or in the temporary custody of
another person or agency subject to such conditions of conduct and of visitation or supervision by a juvenile probation officer as the court may prescribe, if:

Consent is given by the parties, including the child and his parent, guardian, or other legal custodian after being fully informed by the court of their rights in the proceeding, including their right to have an adjudication made either dismissing or
sustaining the petition;

Such continuation shall extend no longer than six months without review by the court. Upon review, the court may continue the case for an additional period not to exceed six months, after which the petition shall either be dismissed or sustained.

When the court finds that the allegations of the petition are not supported by a preponderance of the evidence, the court shall order the petition dismissed and the child discharged from any detention or restriction previously ordered. His or her parents,
guardian, or legal custodian shall also be discharged from any restriction or other previous temporary order. The court shall inform the respondent that, pursuant to section 19-3-313.5 (3)(f), the department shall expunge the records
and reports for purposes related to employment or background checks.

When the court finds that the allegations of the petition are supported by a preponderance of the evidence, except when the case is continued as provided in the introductory portion to subsection (5) of this section, the court shall sustain the petition
and shall make an order of adjudication setting forth whether the child is neglected or dependent. Evidence that child abuse or nonaccidental injury has occurred shall constitute prima facie evidence that such child is
neglected or dependent, and such evidence shall be sufficient to support an adjudication under this section.

The court shall then hold the dispositional hearing, but such hearing may be continued on the motion of any interested party or on the motion of the court. Such continuance shall not exceed thirty days unless good cause exists. In a county designated
pursuant to section 19-1-123, if the child is under six years of age at the time a petition is filed in accordance with section 19-3-501 (2), the dispositional hearing shall be held within thirty days after the adjudicatory
hearing unless good cause is shown and unless the court finds that the best interests of the child will be served by granting a delay. It is the intent of the general assembly that the dispositional hearing be held on the
same day as the adjudicatory hearing, whenever possible.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 781, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 94:
(3) and (7) amended, p. 2053, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 96:
(6) amended, p. 1290, § 3, effective January 1, 1997.

L. 2000:
(6) amended, p. 1723, § 5, effective June 1.

L. 2003:
(6) amended, p. 1407, § 12, effective January 1, 2004.

L. 2006:
(4)(d) amended, p. 1402, § 58, effective August 7.

L. 2017:
(4)(d) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1315, § 163, effective May 25.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-3-106 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration contained in the 2003 act amending subsection (6), see section 1 of chapter 196, Session Laws of Colorado 2003. For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263,
Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

19-3-506. Child with a mental health disorder or an intellectual and developmental disability - procedure.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1)(a) is effective until July 1, 2024.] If it appears from the evidence presented at an adjudicatory hearing or otherwise that a child may have an intellectual and developmental disability, as defined in article
10.5 of title 27, the court shall refer the child to the community-centered board in the designated service area where the action is pending for an eligibility determination pursuant to article 10.5 of title 27.

(1)

(a) [Editor's note: This version of subsection (1)(a) is effective July 1, 2024.] If it appears from the evidence presented at an adjudicatory hearing or otherwise that a child may have an intellectual and developmental disability, as defined in article
10.5 of title 27, the court shall refer the child to the case management agency, as defined in section 25.5-6-1702, in the defined service area where the action is pending for an eligibility determination pursuant to
article 6 of title 25.5 or article 10.5 of title 27.

If it appears from the evidence presented at an adjudicatory hearing or otherwise that a child may have a mental health disorder, as defined in section 27-65-102, and the child has not had a mental health disorder prescreening pursuant to section 19-3-403
(4), the court shall order a prescreening to determine whether the child requires further evaluation. The prescreening must be conducted as expeditiously as possible, and a prescreening report must be provided to the court
within twenty-four hours after the prescreening, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays.

If the mental health professional finds, based upon a prescreening done pursuant to this section or section 19-3-403 (4), that the child may have a mental health disorder, as defined in section 27-65-102, the court shall review the prescreening report
within twenty-four hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, and order the child placed for an evaluation at a facility designated by the commissioner of the behavioral health administration for an emergency
mental health hold pursuant to section 27-65-106. On and after January 1, 1986, if the child to be placed is in a detention facility, the designated facility shall admit the child within twenty-four hours after the court
orders an evaluation, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays.

An evaluation conducted pursuant to this subsection (1) must be completed within seventy-two hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays. A county jail or a detention facility, as described in article 2.5 of this title 19, is not considered
a suitable facility for evaluation, although a mental health disorder prescreening may be conducted in any appropriate setting.

If the mental health professional finds, based upon the prescreening, that the child does not have a mental health disorder, the court shall review the prescreening report within twenty-four hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, and
copies of the report shall be furnished to all parties and their attorneys. Any interested party may request a hearing on the issue of the child's mental health disorder, and the court may order additional prescreenings
as deemed appropriate. The court shall not enter an order for a seventy-two-hour treatment and evaluation unless a hearing is held and evidence indicates that the prescreening report is inadequate, incomplete, or incorrect
and that competent professional evidence is presented from a mental health professional that indicates that a mental health disorder is present in the child. The court shall make, prior to the hearing, such orders regarding
temporary custody of the child as are deemed appropriate.

When an evaluation is ordered by the court pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the order must specify the person or agency to whom the child shall be released when the evaluation indicates that the child does not have a mental health disorder.

When the court orders an evaluation pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, such order shall not obligate the person doing the prescreening or the agency which such person represents to pay for an evaluation or for any hospitalization provided to
the child as a result of an evaluation.

When the evaluation conducted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section states that the child has a mental health disorder, as defined in section 27-65-102, the court shall treat the evaluation report as a certification under section 27-65-109 and shall
proceed pursuant to article 65 of title 27, assuming all of the powers granted to a court in such proceedings.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (3)(b) is effective until July 1, 2024.] When, subsequent to referral to a community centered board pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, it appears that the child has developmental disabilities, the court
may proceed pursuant to article 10.5 of title 27, C.R.S., or may follow any of the recommendations contained in the report from the community centered board.

(b)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (3)(b) is effective July 1, 2024.

]
When, subsequent to referral to a case management agency, as defined in section 25.5-6-1702, pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, it appears that the child has intellectual and developmental disabilities,
the court may proceed pursuant to article 10.5 of title 27 or may follow any of the recommendations contained in the report from the case management agency.

If the child remains in treatment or receives services ordered pursuant to paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection (3), the court may suspend the proceedings or dismiss any actions pending under this title.

If a child receiving treatment or services ordered pursuant to paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection (3) leaves a treatment facility or program without prior approval, the facility or program shall notify the court of the child's absence within twenty-four
hours. When such child is taken into custody, the facility or program shall be notified by the court and shall readmit the child within twenty-four hours after receiving such notification, excluding Saturdays, Sundays,
and legal holidays.

When the report of the evaluation or eligibility determination conducted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section states that the child does not have a mental health disorder or an intellectual and developmental disability, the child shall be released
to the person or agency specified pursuant to subsection (2) of this section within twenty-four hours after the evaluation has been completed, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays. The child must not be detained
unless a new detention hearing is held within twenty-four hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, and the court finds at that hearing that secure detention is necessary.

When the evaluation report or eligibility determination states that the child does not have a mental health disorder or an intellectual and developmental disability, the court shall set a time for resuming the hearing on the petition or any other pending
matters.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 783, § 1, effective October 1; (1)(b) and (1)(c) amended, p. 1586, § 58, effective October 1.

L. 92:
(1)(a) amended, p. 1398, § 57, effective July 1.

L. 94:
(1)(c) amended, p. 2684, § 203, effective July 1.

L. 2006:
(1)(b), (1)(c), (1)(e), (2)(a), (3)(a), and (4) amended, p. 1402, § 59, effective August 7.

L. 2010:
(1)(b), (1)(c), and (3)(a) amended, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 792, § 45, effective April 29.

L. 2017:
(1), (2)(a), (3)(a), and (4) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1315, § 164, effective May 25.

L. 2021:
(1)(d) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 732, § 78, effective October 1; (1)(a) and (3)(b) amended, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 327, § 11, effective July 1, 2024.

L. 2022:
(1)(b), (1)(c), and (3)(a) amended, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3233, § 38, effective August 10.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-3-107 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.